Washington statutes.
RCW 11.54.100

Exhaustion of estate—Closure of estate—Discharge of personal representative.

If an award provided by this chapter will exhaust the estate, and probate proceedings have been commenced in the state of Washington, the court in the order of award or allowance shall order the estate closed, discharge the personal representative, and exonerate the personal representative's bond, if any.

[ 1997 c 252 s 57.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.